Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF381.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin DAYTON; HISTORIC VILLAGE LAND ACQUISITION.new text end new text begin $400,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Dayton economic development authority to acquire real property in the Historic Village for redevelopment to create economically viable and public purpose use. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end